District of Columbia statutes.
47-1033

National Society United States Daughters of 1812; lot 811, square 210.

The property situated in square no. 210 in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, described as lot 811, occupied and used by the National Society United States Daughters of 1812, is hereby exempt from all taxation so long as the same is so occupied and used, subject to the provisions of § 47-1002, providing for exemptions of church and school property.

June 4, 1934, 48 Stat. 836, ch. 376
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1973 Ed., § 47-826.
1981 Ed., § 47-1033.